California statutes. Business and Professions Code
This report reflects data only for settlements made on or after January 1, 2003. Moreover, it includes information concerning those settlements for a 10-year period only. Therefore, you should know that a licensee may have made settlements in the 10 years immediately preceding January 1, 2003, that are not included in this report. After January 1, 2013, for licensees practicing less than 10 years, the data covers their total years of practice. You should take into account the effective date of
 settlement disclosure as well as how long the licensee has been in practice when considering
 malpractice averages.

The incident causing the malpractice claim may have happened years before a payment is finally made. Sometimes, it takes a long time for a malpractice lawsuit to settle. Some licensees work primarily with high-risk patients. These licensees may have malpractice settlement histories that are higher than average because they specialize in cases or patients who are at very high risk for problems.

Settlement of a claim may occur for a variety of reasons that do not necessarily reflect negatively on the professional competence or conduct of the licensee. A payment in settlement of a medical malpractice action or claim should not be construed as creating a presumption that medical malpractice has occurred.

You may wish to discuss information in
 this report and the
 general issue of malpractice with the licensee.”

(e) The Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, and the Physician Assistant Board shall, by regulation, develop standard terminology that accurately describes the different types of disciplinary filings and actions to take against a licensee as described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a). In providing the public with information about a licensee via the internet pursuant to Section 2027, the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, and the Physician Assistant Board shall not use the terms “enforcement,” “discipline,” or similar language implying
 a sanction unless the licensee has been the subject of one of the actions described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(f) The Medical Board of California shall adopt regulations no later than July 1, 2003, designating each specialty and subspecialty practice area as either high risk or low risk. In promulgating these regulations, the board shall consult with commercial underwriters of medical malpractice insurance companies, health care systems that self-insure physicians and surgeons, and representatives of the California medical specialty societies. The board shall utilize the carriers’ statewide data to establish the two risk categories and the averages required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). Prior to issuing regulations, the board shall convene public meetings with the medical malpractice
 carriers, self-insurers, and specialty representatives.

(g) The Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, and the Physician Assistant Board shall provide each licensee, including a former licensee under subdivision (a), with a copy of the text of any proposed public disclosure authorized by this section prior to release of the disclosure to the public. The licensee shall have 10 working days from the date the board provides the copy of the proposed public disclosure to propose corrections of factual inaccuracies. Nothing in this section shall prevent the board from disclosing information to the public prior to the expiration of the 10-day period.

(h) Pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (b), the specialty or subspecialty information required by this section shall group licensees by specialty board recognized pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 651 unless a different grouping would be more valid and the board, in its statement of reasons for its regulations, explains why the validity of the grouping would be more valid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

803.5.

(a) The district attorney, city attorney, or other prosecuting agency shall notify the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, the Physician Assistant Board, or other appropriate allied health board, and the clerk of the court in which the charges have been filed, of any filings against a licensee of that board charging a felony immediately upon obtaining information that the defendant is a licensee of the board. The notice shall identify the licensee and describe the crimes charged and the facts alleged. The prosecuting agency shall also notify the clerk of the court in which the action is pending that the defendant is a
 licensee, and the clerk shall record prominently in the file that the defendant holds a license from one of the boards described above.

(b) The clerk of the court in which a licensee of one of the boards is convicted of a crime shall, within 48 hours after the conviction, transmit a certified copy of the record of conviction to the applicable board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 7.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

803.6.

(a) The clerk of the court shall transmit any felony preliminary hearing transcript concerning a defendant licensee to the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, the Physician Assistant Board, or other appropriate allied health board, as applicable, where the total length of the transcript is under 800 pages and shall notify the appropriate board of any proceeding where the transcript exceeds that length.

(b) In any case where a probation report on a licensee is prepared for a court pursuant to Section 1203 of the Penal Code, a copy of that report shall be transmitted by the probation officer to the
 board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 8.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

804.

(a) Any agency to whom reports are to be sent under Section 801, 801.1, 802, or 803, may develop a prescribed form for the making of the reports, usage of which it may, but need not, by regulation, require in all cases.

(b) A report required to be made by Sections 801, 801.1, or 802 shall be deemed complete only if it includes the following information: (1) the name and last known business and residential addresses of every plaintiff or claimant involved in the matter, whether or not each plaintiff or claimant recovered anything; (2) the name and last known business and residential addresses of every physician or provider of health care services who was claimed or alleged to have acted improperly, whether or not that person was a named defendant and whether or not any recovery or judgment was had against that person; (3) the name, address, and principal place of business of every insurer providing professional liability insurance as to any person named in (2), and the insured’s policy number; (4) the name of the court in which the action or any part of the action was filed along with the date of filing and docket number of each action; (5) a brief description or summary of the facts upon which each claim, charge or judgment rested including the date of occurrence; (6) the names and last known business and residential addresses of every person who acted as counsel for any party in the litigation or negotiations, along with an identification of the party whom said person represented; (7) the date and amount of final judgment or settlement; and (8) any other information the agency to whom the reports are to be sent may, by regulation, require.

(c) Every person named in the report, who is notified by the board within 60 days of the filing of the report, shall maintain for the period of three years from the filing of the report any records he or she has as to the matter in question and shall make those available upon request to the agency with which the report was filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 223, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

804.5.

The Legislature recognizes that various types of entities are creating, implementing, and maintaining patient safety and risk management programs that encourage early intervention in order to address known complications and other unanticipated events requiring medical care. The Legislature recognizes that some entities even provide financial assistance to individual patients to help them address these unforeseen health care concerns. It is the intent of the Legislature, however, that such financial assistance not limit a patient’s interaction with, or his or her rights before, the Medical Board of California.

Any entity that provides early intervention, patient safety, or risk management programs to patients, or contracts for those programs for patients, shall not include, as part of any
 of those programs or contracts, any of the following:

(a) A provision that prohibits a patient or patients from contacting or cooperating with the board.

(b) A provision that prohibits a patient or patients from filing a complaint with the board.

(c) A provision that requires a patient or patients to withdraw a complaint that has been filed with the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 505, Sec. 2.   (AB 1070)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

805.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following definitions:

(1) (A) “Peer review” means both of the following:

(i) A process in which a peer review body reviews the basic qualifications, staff privileges, employment, medical outcomes, or professional conduct of licentiates to make recommendations for quality improvement and education, if necessary, in order to do either or both of the following:

(I) Determine whether a licentiate may practice or continue to practice in a health care facility, clinic, or other setting providing medical
 services, and, if so, to determine the parameters of that
 practice.

(II) Assess and improve the quality of care rendered in a health care facility, clinic, or other setting providing medical services.

(ii) Any other activities of a peer review body as specified in subparagraph (B).

(B) “Peer review body” includes:

(i) A medical or professional staff of any health care facility or clinic licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code or of a facility certified to participate in the federal Medicare program as an ambulatory surgical center.

(ii) A health care service plan licensed under Chapter 2.2 (commencing
 with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code or a disability insurer that contracts with licentiates to provide services at alternative rates of payment pursuant to Section 10133 of the Insurance Code.

(iii) Any medical, psychological, marriage and family therapy, social work, professional clinical counselor, dental, midwifery, or podiatric professional society having as members at least 25 percent of the eligible licentiates in the area in which it functions (which must include at least one county), which is not organized for profit and which has been determined to be exempt from taxes pursuant to Section 23701 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(iv) A committee organized by any entity consisting of or employing more than 25 licentiates of the same class that functions
 for the purpose of reviewing the quality of professional care provided by members or employees of that entity.

(2) “Licentiate” means a physician and surgeon, doctor of podiatric medicine, clinical psychologist, marriage and family therapist, clinical social worker, professional clinical counselor, dentist, licensed midwife, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to Section 2837.103 or 2837.104. “Licentiate” also includes a person authorized to practice medicine pursuant to Section 2113 or 2168.

(3) “Agency” means the relevant state licensing agency having regulatory jurisdiction over the licentiates listed in paragraph (2).

(4) “Staff privileges” means any arrangement under which a licentiate
 is allowed to practice in or provide care for patients in a health facility. Those arrangements shall include, but are not limited to, full staff privileges, active staff privileges, limited staff privileges, auxiliary staff privileges, provisional staff privileges, temporary staff privileges, courtesy staff privileges, locum tenens arrangements, and contractual arrangements to provide professional services, including, but not limited to, arrangements to provide outpatient services.

(5) “Denial or termination of staff privileges, membership, or employment” includes failure or refusal to renew a contract or to renew, extend, or reestablish any staff privileges, if the action is based on medical disciplinary cause or reason.

(6) “Medical disciplinary cause or reason” means that aspect of
 a licentiate’s competence or professional conduct that is reasonably likely to be detrimental to patient safety or to the delivery of patient care.

(7) “805 report” means the written report required under subdivision (b).

(b) The chief of staff of a medical or professional staff or other chief executive officer, medical director, or administrator of any peer review body and the chief executive officer or administrator of any licensed health care facility or clinic shall file an 805 report with the relevant agency within 15 days after the effective date on which any of the following occur as a result of an action of a peer review body:

(1) A licentiate’s application for staff privileges or membership is denied or
 rejected for a medical disciplinary cause or reason.

(2) A licentiate’s membership, staff privileges, or employment is terminated or revoked for a medical disciplinary cause or reason.

(3) Restrictions are imposed, or voluntarily accepted, on staff privileges, membership, or employment for a cumulative total of 30 days or more for any 12-month period, for a medical disciplinary cause or reason.

(c) If a licentiate takes any action listed in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) after receiving notice of a pending investigation initiated for a medical disciplinary cause or reason or after receiving notice that their application for membership or staff privileges is denied or will be denied for a medical disciplinary cause or reason, the chief
 of staff of a medical or professional staff or other chief executive officer, medical director, or administrator of any peer review body and the chief executive officer or administrator of any licensed health care facility or clinic where the licentiate is employed or has staff privileges or membership or where the licentiate applied for staff privileges or membership, or sought the renewal thereof, shall file an 805 report with the relevant agency within 15 days after the licentiate takes the action.

(1) Resigns or takes a leave of absence from membership, staff privileges, or employment.

(2) Withdraws or abandons their application for staff privileges or membership.

(3) Withdraws or abandons their request for renewal
 of staff privileges or membership.

(d) For purposes of filing an 805 report, the signature of at least one of the individuals indicated in subdivision (b) or (c) on the completed form shall constitute compliance with the requirement to file the report.

(e) An 805 report shall also be filed within 15 days following the imposition of summary suspension of staff privileges, membership, or employment, if the summary suspension remains in effect for a period in excess of 14 days.

(f) (1) A copy of the 805 report, and a notice advising the licentiate of their right to submit additional statements or other
 information, electronically or otherwise, pursuant to Section 800, shall be sent by the peer review body to the licentiate named in the report. The notice shall also advise the licentiate that information submitted electronically will be publicly disclosed to those who request the information.

(2) The information to be reported in an 805 report shall include the name and license number of the licentiate involved, a description of the facts and circumstances of the medical disciplinary cause or reason, and any other relevant information deemed appropriate by the reporter.

(3) A supplemental report shall also be made within 30 days following the date the licentiate is deemed to have satisfied any terms, conditions, or sanctions imposed as disciplinary action by the
 reporting peer review body. In performing its dissemination functions required by Section 805.5, the agency shall include a copy of a supplemental report, if any, whenever it furnishes a copy of the original 805 report.

(4) If another peer review body is required to file an 805 report, a health care service plan is not required to file a separate report with respect to action attributable to the same medical disciplinary cause or reason. If the Medical Board of California or a licensing agency of another state revokes or suspends, without a stay, the license of a physician and surgeon, a peer review body is not required to file an 805 report when it takes an action as a result of the revocation or suspension. If the California Board of Podiatric Medicine or a licensing agency of another state revokes or suspends, without a stay, the
 license of a doctor of podiatric medicine, a peer review body is not required to file an 805 report when it takes an action as a result of the revocation or suspension.
 If the Board of Registered Nursing or a licensing agency of another state revokes or suspends, without a stay, the license of a nurse practitioner, a peer review body is not required to file an 805 report when it takes an action as a result of the revocation or suspension.

(g) The reporting required by this section shall not act as a waiver of confidentiality of medical records and committee reports. The information reported or disclosed shall be kept confidential except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 800 and Sections 803.1 and 2027, provided that a copy of the report containing the information required by this section may be disclosed as required by Section 805.5 with respect to reports received on or after January 1, 1976.

(h) The Medical Board of California,
 the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the Dental Board of California, and the Board of Registered Nursing shall disclose reports as required by Section 805.5.

(i) An 805 report shall be maintained electronically by an agency for dissemination purposes for a period of three years after receipt.

(j) No person shall incur any civil or criminal liability as the result of making any report required by this section.

(k) A willful failure to file an 805 report by any person who is designated or otherwise required by law to file an 805 report is punishable by a fine not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per violation. The fine may be imposed in any civil or administrative
 action or proceeding brought by or on behalf of any agency having regulatory jurisdiction over the person regarding whom the report was or should have been filed. If the person who is designated or otherwise required to file an 805 report is a licensed physician and surgeon, the action or proceeding shall be brought by the Medical Board of California. If the person who is designated or otherwise required to file an 805 report is a licensed doctor of podiatric medicine, the action or proceeding shall be brought by the California Board of Podiatric Medicine. If the person who is designated or otherwise required to file an 805 report is a licensed nurse practitioner, the action or proceeding shall be brought by the Board of Registered Nursing. The fine shall be paid to that agency but not expended until appropriated by the Legislature. A violation of this subdivision may constitute unprofessional
 conduct by the licentiate. A person who is alleged to have violated this subdivision may assert any defense available at law. As used in this subdivision, “willful” means a voluntary and intentional violation of a known legal duty.

(l) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (k), any failure by the administrator of any peer review body, the chief executive officer or administrator of any health care facility, or any person who is designated or otherwise required by law to file an 805 report, shall be punishable by a fine that under no circumstances shall exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per violation. The fine may be imposed in any civil or administrative action or proceeding brought by or on behalf of any agency having regulatory jurisdiction over the person regarding whom the report was or should have been filed. If the person who is
 designated or otherwise required to file an 805 report is a licensed physician and surgeon, the action or proceeding shall be brought by the Medical Board of California. If the person who is designated or otherwise required to file an 805 report is a licensed doctor of podiatric medicine, the action or proceeding shall be brought by the California Board of Podiatric Medicine. If the person who is designated or otherwise required to file an 805 report is a licensed nurse practitioner, the action or proceeding shall be brought by the Board of Registered Nursing. The fine shall be paid to that agency but not expended until appropriated by the Legislature. The amount of the fine imposed, not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per violation, shall be proportional to the severity of the failure to report and shall differ based upon written findings,
 including whether the failure to file caused harm to a patient or created a risk to patient safety; whether the administrator of any peer review body, the chief executive officer or administrator of any health care facility, or any person who is designated or otherwise required by law to file an 805 report exercised due diligence despite the failure to file or whether they knew or should have known that an 805 report would not be filed; and whether there has been a prior failure to file an 805 report. The amount of the fine imposed may also differ based on whether a health care facility is a small or rural hospital as defined in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code.

(m) A health care service plan licensed under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code or a disability
 insurer that negotiates and enters into a contract with licentiates to provide services at alternative rates of payment pursuant to Section 10133 of the Insurance Code, when determining participation with the plan or insurer, shall evaluate, on a case-by-case basis, licentiates who are the subject of an 805 report, and not automatically exclude or deselect these licentiates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 265, Sec. 2.   (AB 890)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

805.01.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following definitions:

(1) “Agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 805.

(2) “Formal investigation” means an investigation performed by a peer review body based on an allegation that any of the acts listed in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b) occurred.

(3) “Licentiate” has the same meaning as defined in Section 805.

(4) “Peer review body” has the same meaning as defined in Section 805.

(b) The chief of staff of a medical or professional staff or other chief executive officer, medical director, or administrator of any peer review body and the chief executive officer or administrator of any licensed health care facility or clinic shall file a report with the relevant agency within 15 days after a peer review body makes a final decision or recommendation regarding the disciplinary action, as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 805, resulting in a final proposed action to be taken against a licentiate based on the peer review body’s determination, following formal investigation of the licentiate, that any of the acts listed in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, may have occurred, regardless of whether a hearing is held pursuant to Section 809.2. The licentiate shall receive a notice of the proposed action as set forth in
 Section 809.1, which shall also include a notice advising the licentiate of the right to submit additional explanatory or exculpatory statements electronically or otherwise.

(1) Incompetence, or gross or repeated deviation from the standard of care involving death or serious bodily injury to one or more patients, to the extent or in such a manner as to be dangerous or injurious to any person or to the public. This paragraph shall not be construed to affect or require the imposition of immediate suspension pursuant to Section 809.5.

(2) The use of, or prescribing for or administering to himself or herself, any controlled substance; or the use of any dangerous drug, as defined in Section 4022, or of alcoholic beverages, to the extent or in such a manner as to be dangerous or
 injurious to the licentiate, any other person, or the public, or to the extent that such use impairs the ability of the licentiate to practice safely.

(3) Repeated acts of clearly excessive prescribing, furnishing, or administering of controlled substances or repeated acts of prescribing, dispensing, or furnishing of controlled substances without a good faith effort prior examination of the patient and medical reason therefor. However, in no event shall a physician and surgeon prescribing, furnishing, or administering controlled substances for intractable pain, consistent with lawful prescribing, be reported for excessive prescribing and prompt review of the applicability of these provisions shall be made in any complaint that may implicate these provisions.

(4) Sexual misconduct
 with one or more patients during a course of treatment or an examination.

(c) The relevant agency shall be entitled to inspect and copy the following documents in the record of any formal investigation required to be reported pursuant to subdivision (b):

(1) Any statement of charges.

(2) Any document, medical chart, or exhibit.

(3) Any opinions, findings, or conclusions.

(4) Any certified copy of medical records, as permitted by other applicable law.

(d) The report provided pursuant to subdivision (b) and the information disclosed pursuant
 to subdivision (c) shall be kept confidential and shall not be subject to discovery, except that the information may be reviewed as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 800 and may be disclosed in any subsequent disciplinary hearing conducted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(e) The report required under this section shall be in addition to any report required under Section 805.

(f) A peer review body shall not be required to make a report pursuant to this section if that body does not make a final decision or recommendation regarding the disciplinary action to be taken against a licentiate based on the body’s determination that any of the acts listed in
 paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b) may have occurred.

(g) A willful failure to file a report pursuant to this section by any person who is designated or otherwise required by law to file a report is punishable by a fine not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per violation. The fine may be imposed in any civil or administrative action or proceeding brought by or on behalf of any agency having regulatory jurisdiction over the person who filed or should have filed the report. If the person who is designated or otherwise required to file a report is a licensed physician and surgeon, the action or proceeding shall be brought by the Medical Board of California. The fine shall be paid to that agency. A violation of this subdivision may constitute unprofessional conduct by the licentiate. A person who is alleged to have
 violated this subdivision may assert any defense available at law. As used in this subdivision, “willful” means a voluntary and intentional violation of a known legal duty.

(h) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), any failure by the administrator of any peer review body, the chief executive officer or administrator of any health care facility, or any person who is designated or otherwise required by law to file a report pursuant to this section, shall be punishable by a fine that under no circumstances shall exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per violation. The fine may be imposed in any civil or administrative action or proceeding brought by or on behalf of any agency having regulatory jurisdiction over the person who filed or should have filed the report. If the person who is designated or otherwise required to file
 a report is a licensed physician and surgeon, the action or proceeding shall be brought by the Medical Board of California. The fine shall be paid to that agency. The amount of the fine imposed, not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per violation, shall be proportional to the severity of the failure to report and shall differ based upon written findings, including (i) whether the failure to file caused harm to a patient or created a risk to patient safety, (ii) whether the administrator of any peer review body, the chief executive officer or administrator of any health care facility, or any person who is designated or otherwise required by law to file a report exercised due diligence despite the failure to file or whether they knew or should have known that a report would not be filed, and (3) whether there has been a prior failure to file a report. The amount of the fine imposed may also differ
 based on whether a health care facility is a small or rural hospital as defined in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 12.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

805.1.

(a) The Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, and the Dental Board of California shall be entitled to inspect and copy the following documents in the record of any disciplinary proceeding resulting in action that is required to be reported pursuant to Section 805:

(1) Any statement of charges.

(2) Any document, medical chart, or exhibits in evidence.

(3) Any opinion, findings, or conclusions.

(4) Any certified copy of medical
 records, as permitted by other applicable law.

(b) The information so disclosed shall be kept confidential and not subject to discovery, in accordance with Section 800, except that it may be reviewed, as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 800, and may be disclosed in any subsequent disciplinary hearing conducted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 13.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

805.2.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide for a comprehensive study of the peer review process as it is conducted by peer review bodies defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 805, in order to evaluate the continuing validity of Section 805 and Sections 809 to 809.8, inclusive, and their relevance to the conduct of peer review in California.

(b) The Medical Board of California shall contract with an independent entity to conduct this study that is fair, objective, and free from bias that is directly familiar with the peer review process and does not advocate regularly before the board on peer review matters or on physician and surgeon disciplinary matters.

(c) The study by the independent entity shall include, but not be limited to, the following components:

(1) A comprehensive description of the various steps of and decisionmakers in the peer review process as it is conducted by peer review bodies throughout the state, including the role of other related committees of acute care health facilities and clinics involved in the peer review process.

(2) A survey of peer review cases to determine the incidence of peer review by peer review bodies, and whether they are complying with the reporting requirement in Section 805.

(3) A description and evaluation of the roles and performance of various state agencies, including the State Department of Health Services and occupational licensing agencies that regulate healing arts professionals, in receiving, reviewing, investigating, and disclosing peer review actions, and in sanctioning peer review bodies for failure to comply with Section 805.

(4) An assessment of the cost of peer review to licentiates and the facilities which employ them.

(5) An assessment of the time consumed by the average peer review proceeding, including the hearing provided pursuant to Section 809.2, and a description of any difficulties encountered by either licentiates or facilities in assembling peer review bodies or panels to participate in peer review decisionmaking.

(6) An assessment of the need to amend Section 805 and Sections 809 to 809.8, inclusive, to ensure that they continue to be relevant to the actual conduct of peer review as described in paragraph (1), and to evaluate whether the current reporting requirement is yielding timely and accurate information to aid licensing boards in their responsibility to regulate and discipline healing arts practitioners when necessary, and to assure that peer review bodies function in the best interest of patient care.

(7) Recommendations of additional mechanisms to stimulate the appropriate reporting of peer review actions under Section 805.

(8) Recommendations regarding the Section 809 hearing process to improve its overall effectiveness and efficiency.

(9) An assessment of the role of medical professionals, using professionals who are experts and are actively practicing medicine in this state, to review and investigate for the protection of consumers, allegations of substandard practice or professional misconduct.

(10) An assessment of the process to identify and retain a medical professional with sufficient expertise to review allegations of substandard practice or professional misconduct by a physician and surgeon, if the peer review process is discontinued.

(d) The independent entity shall exercise no authority over the peer review processes of peer review bodies. However, peer review bodies, health care facilities, health care clinics, and health care service plans shall cooperate with the independent entity in providing raw data, information, and case files as requested in a mutually agreeable timeframe.

(e) The case files and other information obtained by the independent entity shall be confidential. The independent entity shall not release the case files or other information it obtains to any individual, agency, or entity, including the board, except as aggregate data, examples, or in the final report submitted to the board and the Legislature, but in no case shall information released under these exemptions be identifiable in any way or associated with, or related to, a specific facility, individual, or peer review body.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, information obtained by the independent entity from a peer review body or from any other person or entity and information otherwise generated by the independent entity, including, but not limited to, raw data, patient information, case files or records, interviews and records of interviews, proceedings of a peer review body, and analyses or conclusions of the independent entity, shall not be subject to discovery or to a subpoena or a subpoena duces tecum and shall not be admissible as evidence in any court of law in this state. The information described in this subdivision shall be subject to all other confidentiality protections and privileges otherwise provided by law. The independent entity and its employees and contractors shall assert all of the protections for the information described in this subdivision that may apply in order to protect the information from disclosure. However, nothing in this section shall affect provisions of law relating to otherwise admissible material obtainable from sources other than the independent entity.

(g) The independent entity shall report to the peer review body any information it obtains from the peer review body that the independent entity determines should have been reported pursuant to Section 805. The independent entity shall include with the report a clear explanation of the reasons it determined that the information warrants a report under Section 805. If the peer review body agrees with the independent entity’s determination, the peer review body shall report the information pursuant to Section 805 without being subject to penalties under subdivision (k) or (l) of Section 805, if the peer review body makes the report to the board within 30 days of the date the independent entity reported its determination to the peer review body, unless additional time is required to afford due process or fair hearing rights to the subject of the report as required by Section 805 and Sections 809.1 and following.

(h) The independent entity shall work in cooperation with and under the general oversight of the Executive Director of the Medical Board of California and shall submit a written report with its findings and recommendations to the board and the Legislature no later than July 31, 2008.

 (i) Completion of the peer review study pursuant to this section shall be among the highest priorities of the Medical Board of California, and the board shall ensure that it is completed no later than July 31, 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 223, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

805.5.

(a) Prior to granting or renewing staff privileges for any physician and surgeon, psychologist, podiatrist, dentist, or nurse practitioner, any health facility licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code, any health care service plan or medical care foundation, the medical staff of the institution, a facility certified to participate in the federal Medicare Program as an ambulatory surgical center, or an outpatient setting accredited pursuant to Section 1248.1 of the Health and Safety Code shall request a report from the Medical Board of California, the Board of Psychology, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the Dental Board of California, or